Washington statutes.
RCW 19.60.057

Retention of precious metal property—Inspection.

(1) Property consisting of a precious metal bought or received from an individual on consignment by any secondhand precious metal dealer with a permanent place of business in the state may not be removed from that place of business except consigned property returned to the owner, for a total of thirty days after the receipt of the property. Property shall at all times during the ordinary hours of business be open to inspection to any commissioned law enforcement officer of the state or any of its political subdivisions.

(2) Property consisting of a precious metal bought or received from an individual on consignment by any secondhand precious metal dealer without a permanent place of business in the state must be stored and held within the city or county in which the property was received, except consigned property returned to the owner, for a total of thirty days after receipt of the property. The property shall be available within the appropriate jurisdiction for inspection at reasonable times by any commissioned law enforcement officer of the state or any of its political subdivisions.

(3) Subsections (1) and (2) of this section do not apply when the property consisting of a precious metal was bought or received from a pawn shop, jeweler, secondhand dealer, or secondhand precious metal dealer who must provide a signed declaration showing the property is not stolen. The declaration may be included as part of the transactional record required under this subsection, or on a receipt for the transaction. The declaration must state substantially the following: "I, the undersigned, affirm under penalty of law that the property that is subject to this transaction is not to the best of my knowledge stolen property."

[ 2011 c 289 s 4.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2011 c 289: See note following RCW 19.60.010.